Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-3144
Nebraska Pregnancy Help Act, how cited.

Sections 77-3144 to 77-3153 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Pregnancy Help Act.

Laws 2024, LB937, § 24.